en: organic extra virgin olive oil
bg: био екстра върджин зехтин
da: økologisk ekstra jomfruolivenolie
de: Natives Bio-Olivenöl Extra
es: aceite de oliva extra virgen orgánico
fi: luomu ekstra-neitsytoliiviöljy
fr: huile d'olive vierge extra bio, huile d'olive vierge extra issue de l'agriculture biologique, huile d'olive vierge extra biologique
hr: organsko ekstra djevičansko maslinovo ulje, bio ekstra djevičansko maslinovo ulje
hu: extra szűz bio olívaolaj, bio extra szűz olívaolaj
it: Olio di oliva extra vergine biologico
nl: biologische extra olijfolie van de eerste persing
pt: azeite extra virgem biológico, azeite virgem extra biológico, azeite de oliva extra virgem biológico, azeite de oliva virgem extra biológico
sv: ekologisk extra jungfruolivolja

en: Spanish organic olive oil
da: spansk økologisk olivenolie
de: Spanisches Bio-Olivenöl
fi: luomu espanjalainen oliiviöljy
fr: Huile d’olive bio d’Espagne
hr: španjolsko organsko maslinovo ulje
it: olio d'oliva biologico spagnolo
nl: olie van biologische Spaanse olijven
pt: azeite biológico espanhol, azeite biológico de Espanha, azeite de oliva biológico espanhol, azeite de oliva biológico de Espanha
sv: spansk ekologisk olivolja, ekologisk spansk olivolja

en: olive pomace oil
ca: oli de pinyolada d'oliva
de: Oliventresteröl
es: aceite orujo de oliva, aceite de orujo de oliva
hr: maslinovo ulje komine
it: Olio di sansa di oliva
pl: oliwa z wytłoczyn z oliwek, oliwa z wytłoczyn oliwek

en: refined olive pomace oil
hr: rafinirano ulje komine masline
it: olio di sansa di oliva raffinato
pl: rafinowana oliwa z wytłoczyn z oliwek, rafinowana oliwa z wytłoczyn oliwek

en: rapeseed oil, rapeseed fat, rapeseed oil and fat, rapeseed vegetable oil
af: raapsaadolie
ar: زيت بذور اللفت
az: Raps yağı
be: Рапсавы алей
bg: рапично масло
ca: oli de nabina, oli vegetal de nabina
cs: řepkový olej, olej řepkový, olej rostlinný řepkový
da: rapsolie, rapsolje
de: Rapsöl, Rapsol
el: κραμβέλαιο
eo: rapoleo
es: aceite de nabina, aceite vegetal de nabina
et: rapsiõli, rapsiseemneõli, rüpsiõli
eu: Koltza-olio
fa: روغن کلزا
fi: rapsiöljy, rapsirasva, rapsiöljy ja -rasva
ga: Ola ráibe
gl: Aceite de colza
he: שמן לפתית
hi: रेपसीड तेल
hr: repičino ulje, repicino ulje, repičina mast, repičina biljna mast, repičino biljna ulja
hu: repceolaj, repcemagolaj, repcemagolajak, repcemagzsír, repce étolaj
hy: Կռնչենու յուղ
id: Minyak lobak
is: repjuolía
ja: 菜種油
ka: რაფსის ზეთი
kk: Рапс майы
kn: ರೇಪ್ಸೀಡ್ ಎಣ್ಣೆ
ko: 유채유
ky: Рапс майы
lt: rapsų aliejus, augaliniai aliejai rapsų
lv: rapšu eļļa, rapšu ella
mk: Масло од репка
ml: റാപ്സീഡ് ഓയിൽ
mr: रेपसीड तेल
ms: Minyak rapeseed
mt: Żejt tal-kolza
nb: rapsolje
nl: raapolie, raap, raapzaadolie
nn: rapsolje
pl: olej roślinny rzepakowy, olej rzepakowy, olej z rzepaku, oleje roślinne rzepakowy, tłuszcz rzepakowy, tłuszcze roślinne rzepakowy, tłuszcz roślinny rzepakowy
pt: óleo de colza
ro: ulei de rapiță, ulei vegetal de rapiță, ulei de rapita
ru: Рапсовое масло
sk: repkový olej
sl: repična, repično, repična rastlinska maščoba
sq: Vaj repice
sr: Уље репице
sv: rapsolja, rapsfett
ta: ராப்சீட் எண்ணெய்
te: రేప్సీడ్ నూనె
th: น้ำมันเรพซีด
tr: Kolza yağı
uk: Ріпакова олія
ur: ریپسیڈ تیل
uz: Rapeseed yog'i
vi: Dầu hạt cải
zh: 菜籽油

en: refined rapeseed oil
hr: rafinirano ulje repice
it: olio di colza raffinato
lt: rafinuotas rapsų aliejus
pl: rafinowany olej rzepakowy, olej rzepakowy rafinowany

en: British rapeseed oil
de: Britisches Rapsöl
hr: britanskog repičinog ulja
it: olio di colza britannico

en: canola oil
bg: олио от канола
ca: Oli de canola
de: Ölrübsenöl
es: aceite de canola
fr: huile de canola
hr: kanola ulje
hu: kanolaolaj, canolaolaj, canola olaj, canola-olaj, kanola olaj, kanola-olaj
it: Olio di canola
ja: キャノーラ油, なたね油
nl: canola olie, canolaolie
tr: kanola yağı

en: fully hydrogenated canola oil
de: ganz gehärtetes Canola-Öl, vollständig hydriertes Canola-Öl
hr: potpuno hidrogenirano ulje repice
it: olio di canola completamente idrogenato

en: low erucic acid rapeseed oil
de: eurucasäurearmes Rapsöl, LEAR
hr: ulje repice s niskim sadržajem eruka kiseline
it: olio di colza a basso contenuto di acido erucico

en: non-gmo canola oil, non gmo canola oil
de: GVO-freies Rapsöl
es: aceite de canola no modificado genéticamente, aceite de canola no gmo
fr: Huile de colza sans OGM
hr: ne-gmo ulje repice

en: canola oil preparation
hr: pripravak uljane repice
it: preparazione di olio di canola

en: colza oil, colza vegetable oil
bg: рапично олио
ca: oli de colza
de: Kolzaöl, Kohlsaatöl
es: aceite de colza
fr: huile de colza, huile végétale de colza, huile colza, graisses végétales de colza, graisses vegetales de colza, huiles végétales de colza, huile de graines de colza, huile de graine de colza
hr: uljana repica, uljane repice, ulje uljane repice, ulje repice
it: olio di colza, olio vegetale di colza
nl: koolzaadolie, plantaardige koolzaadolie

bg: рафинирано рапично олио
fr: huile de colza raffinée

fr: monodiglycérides de colza
de: Mono- und Diglyceride von Raps
hu: repce mono- és digliceridjei

en: turnip rape oil, turnip rape vegetable oil
da: rybsolie
fi: rypsiöljy, rypsiöljyä
fr: huile de navette
nb: rybsolje
nn: rybsolje
sv: rybsolja, rypsolja

en: turnip rape oil preparation
fi: rypsiöljyvalmiste
sv: rypsoljeberedning

en: palm and rapeseed
de: Palm und Raps
fi: palmu ja rapsi
fr: palme et colza
hr: palma i repica
hu: pálma- és repcemag
it: palma e colza
nl: Palm en koolzaad

en: walnut oil
bg: орехово олио
ca: Oli de nou de noguer
de: Walnussöl, Baumnussöl
es: aceite de nuez
fi: saksanpähkinäöljy
fr: huile de noix
gl: Aceite de noz
hr: orahovo ulje
hu: Dióolaj
it: olio di noci, olio di noci comuni
ja: 綿実油
ko: 호두기름
lt: Graikinių riešutų aliejus
nb: Valnøttolje
nl: walnootolie
pl: Olej z orzecha włoskiego
ru: Ореховое масло
sr: Орахово уље
sv: Valnötsolja, Bomullsfröolja
th: น้ำมันวอลนัต
zh: 核桃油

en: mustard oil
de: Senföl, Senfaroma
fr: Huile de moutarde/Huile de graines de moutarde/Huile de sénevé
hr: ulje senfa
it: olio di senape
ru: масло-горчицы, масло горчицы, эфирное масло горчицы, горчичное масло, масло горчичное